Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-161
Boards; purpose; duties; advisory committees or bodies authorized.

(1) The purpose of each board is to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public as prescribed in the Uniform Credentialing Act.

(2) The duties of each board include, but are not limited to, (a) setting the minimum standards of proficiency and competency in accordance with section 38-126, (b) providing recommendations in accordance with section 38-149, (c) providing recommendations related to the issuance or denial of credentials, disciplinary action, and changes in legislation, and (d) providing the department with recommendations on regulations to carry out the Uniform Credentialing Act in accordance with section 38-126.

(3) Each board may appoint advisory committees or other advisory bodies as necessary for specific purposes. At least one board member shall serve on each advisory committee or body, and other members may be appointed from outside the board.

Laws 1982, LB 448, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-112.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 61.